Mississippi, session 2026, SB2862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 21-1-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-1-59.  (1)  No municipality shall be created or shall change its boundaries so as to include within the limits of such municipality any of the buildings or grounds of any state institution, unless consent thereto shall be obtained in writing from the board of trustees of such institution or such other governing board or body as may be created for the control of such institution.  Inclusion of the buildings or grounds of any state institution within the area of a municipal incorporation or expansion without the consent hereinabove required shall be voidable at the option of the affected institution within six (6) months after the institution becomes aware of the inclusion.  Upon consent to inclusion within the area of a municipal incorporation or expansion, a state institution may require, subject to agreement of the municipality involved, conditions relating to land use development, zoning requirements, building codes and delivery of governmental services which shall be applicable to the buildings or grounds of the institution included in the municipality. Provided further, that any future changes in the boundaries of a presently existing municipality which extends into or further extends into a county other than the county in which the municipality's principal office is located shall not affect the public school district located in the annexed area, unless and until consent thereto shall have first been obtained in writing from the board of trustees of the school district proposed to be partially or wholly included in the change of municipal boundaries. Provided further, that any change in the boundaries of a presently existing municipality of any Class 1 county having two (2) judicial districts, being traversed by U.S. Highway 11 which intersects U.S. Highway 84, shall not affect the public school district located in the annexed area and shall not change the governmental unit to which the school taxes are paid, unless approved by referendum as hereinafter provided. In the event that twenty percent (20%) of the registered voters residing within the area to be annexed by a municipality petition the governing body of such municipality for a referendum on the question of inclusion in the municipal school district within sixty (60) days of public notice of the adoption of such ordinance, such notice given in the same manner and for the same length of time as is provided in Section 21-1-15 with regard to the creation of municipal corporations, the governing body of the county in which the area to be annexed is located shall hold a referendum of all registered voters residing within the area to be annexed on the question of inclusion in the municipal school district. Approval of the ordinance shall be made by a majority vote of the qualified electors voting in said referendum to be held within ninety (90) days from the date of filing and certification of the petition provided for herein on the question of such extension or contraction.  The referendum shall be held in the same manner as are other county elections. The inclusion of buildings or grounds of any state institution within the area of a municipal incorporation or expansion in any proceedings creating a municipality or enlarging the boundaries of a municipality prior to the effective date of Senate Bill 2307, 1987 Regular Session (Chapter 359, eff March 18, 1987), is hereby ratified, confirmed and validated, regardless of whether such inclusion was in conformity with the requirements of this section at the time of such proceedings, and such inclusion shall not be void or voidable by any affected state institution on or after the effective date of Senate Bill 2307, 1987 Regular Session (Chapter 359, eff March 18, 1987).  This paragraph shall not be applicable to and shall not be construed to validate the inclusion of buildings or grounds of any state institution within the area of a municipal incorporation or expansion where such inclusion or the proceedings involving such inclusion were declared invalid or void in a final adjudication of a court of competent jurisdiction prior to the effective date of Senate Bill 2307, 1987 Regular Session (Chapter 359, eff March 18, 1987), and the decision of such court was not appealed within the applicable time period for appeals from such court or was not overturned by any court to which an appeal may have been made. (2)  The governing authorities of a municipality may enter into an agreement with an enterprise operating a project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi), Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix) providing that the municipality shall not change its boundaries so as to include within the limits of such municipality the project site of such a project unless consent thereto shall be obtained in writing from the enterprise operating the project.  Such agreement may be for a period not to exceed thirty (30) years.  Such agreement shall be binding on future governing authorities of such municipality. SECTION 2.  Section 27-31-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-31-1.  The following shall be exempt from taxation: (a)  All cemeteries used exclusively for burial purposes. (b)  All property, real or personal, belonging to the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions, except property of a municipality not being used for a proper municipal purpose and located outside the county or counties in which such municipality is located.  A proper municipal purpose within the meaning of this section shall be any authorized governmental or corporate function of a municipality. (c)  All property, real or personal, owned by units of the Mississippi National Guard, or title to which is vested in trustees for the benefit of any unit of the Mississippi National Guard; provided such property is used exclusively for such unit, or for public purposes, and not for profit. (d)  All property, real or personal, belonging to any religious society, or ecclesiastical body, or any congregation thereof, or to any charitable society, or to any historical or patriotic association or society, or to any garden or pilgrimage club or association and used exclusively for such society or association and not for profit; not exceeding, however, the amount of land which such association or society may own as provided in Section 79-11-33.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any foundation organized as a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that receives, invests and administers private support for a state-supported institution of higher learning, a public community college or junior college located in the State of Mississippi or a nonprofit private university or college located in the State of Mississippi, as the case may be. For the sole purpose of applying the preceding sentence, all property, real or personal, belonging to an entity that is wholly owned by and controlled by such a foundation shall be treated as belonging to the foundation, provided such property is not leased or otherwise used to generate revenue that is not used exclusively to benefit an institution described above.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any rural waterworks system or rural sewage disposal system incorporated under the provisions of Section 79-11-1.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any college or institution for the education of youths, used directly and exclusively for such purposes, provided that no such college or institution for the education of youths shall have exempt from taxation more than six hundred forty (640) acres of land; provided, however, this exemption shall not apply to commercial schools and colleges or trade institutions or schools where the profits of same inure to individuals, associations or corporations.  All property, real or personal, belonging to an individual, institution or corporation and used for the operation of a grammar school, junior high school, high school or military school.  All property, real or personal, owned and occupied by a fraternal and benevolent organization, when used by such organization, and from which no rentals or other profits accrue to the organization, but any part rented or from which revenue is received shall be taxed. (e)  All property, real or personal, held and occupied by trustees of public schools, and school lands of the respective townships for the use of public schools, and all property kept in storage for the convenience and benefit of the State of Mississippi in warehouses owned or leased by the State of Mississippi, wherein said property is to be sold by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (f)  All property, real or personal, whether belonging to religious or charitable or benevolent organizations, which is used for hospital purposes, and nurses' homes where a part thereof, and which maintain one or more charity wards that are for charity patients, and where all the income from said hospitals and nurses' homes is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit.  All property, real or personal, belonging to a federally qualified health center where all the income from such center is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit. (g)  The wearing apparel of every person; and also jewelry and watches kept by the owner for personal use to the extent of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in value for each owner. (h)  Provisions on hand for family consumption. (i)  All farm products grown in this state for a period of two (2) years after they are harvested, when in the possession of or the title to which is in the producer, except the tax of one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) per pound on lint cotton now levied by the Board of Commissioners of the Mississippi Levee District; and lint cotton for five (5) years, and cottonseed, soybeans, oats, rice and wheat for one (1) year regardless of ownership. (j)  All guns and pistols kept by the owner for private use. (k)  All poultry in the hands of the producer. (l)  Household furniture, including all articles kept in the home by the owner for his own personal or family use; but this shall not apply to hotels, rooming houses or rented or leased apartments. (m)  All cattle and oxen. (n)  All sheep, goats and hogs. (o)  All horses, mules and asses. (p)  Farming tools, implements and machinery, when used exclusively in the cultivation or harvesting of crops or timber. (q)  All property of agricultural and mechanical associations and fairs used for promoting their objects, and where no part of the proceeds is used for profit. (r)  The libraries of all persons. (s)  All pictures and works of art, not kept for or offered for sale as merchandise. (t)  The tools of any mechanic necessary for carrying on his trade. (u)  All state, county, municipal, levee, drainage and all school bonds or other governmental obligations, and all bonds and/or evidences of debts issued by any church or church organization in this state, and all notes and evidences of indebtedness which bear a rate of interest not greater than the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all money loaned at a rate of interest not exceeding the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all stock in or bonds of foreign corporations or associations shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes. (v)  All lands and other property situated or located between the Mississippi River and the levee shall be exempt from the payment of any and all road taxes levied or assessed under any road laws of this state. (w)  Any and all money on deposit in either national banks, state banks or trust companies, on open account, savings account or time deposit. (x)  All wagons, carts, drays, carriages and other horse-drawn vehicles, kept for the use of the owner. (y)  (i)  Boats, seines and fishing equipment used in fishing and shrimping operations and in the taking or catching of oysters. (ii)  All towboats, tugboats and barges documented under the laws of the United States, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (z)  (i)  All materials used in the construction and/or conversion of vessels in this state; (ii)  Vessels while under construction and/or conversion; (iii)  Vessels while in the possession of the manufacturer, builder or converter, for a period of twelve (12) months after completion of construction and/or conversion; however, the twelve-month limitation shall not apply to: 1.  Vessels used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals offshore outside the boundaries of this state; or 2.  Vessels that were used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals that are converted to a new service for use outside the boundaries of this state; (iv)  1.  In order for a vessel described in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) to be exempt for a period of more than twelve (12) months, the vessel must: a.  Be operating or operable, generating or capable of generating its own power or connected to some other power source, and not removed from the service or use for which manufactured or to which converted; and b.  The manufacturer, builder, converter or other entity possessing the vessel must be in compliance with any lease or other agreement with any applicable port authority or other entity regarding the vessel and in compliance with all applicable tax laws of this state and applicable federal tax laws. 2.  A vessel exempt from taxation under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) may not be exempt for a period of more than three (3) years unless the board of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, in which the vessel would otherwise be taxable adopts a resolution or ordinance authorizing the extension of the exemption and setting a maximum period for the exemption. (v)  As used in this paragraph (z), the term "vessel" includes ships, offshore drilling equipment, dry docks, boats and barges, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (aa)  Sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of nuclear fuel and reprocessed, recycled or residual nuclear fuel by-products, fissionable or otherwise, used or to be used in generation of electricity by persons defined as public utilities in Section 77-3-3. (bb)  All growing nursery stock. (cc)  A semitrailer used in interstate commerce. (dd)  All property, real or personal, used exclusively for the housing of and provision of services to elderly persons, disabled persons, mentally impaired persons or as a nursing home, which is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose membership or governing body is appointed or confirmed by a religious society or ecclesiastical body or any congregation thereof. (ee)  All vessels while in the hands of bona fide dealers as merchandise and which are not being operated upon the waters of this state shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes. As used in this paragraph, the terms "vessel" and "waters of this state" shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in Section 59-21-3. (ff)  All property, real or personal, owned by a nonprofit organization that:  (i) is qualified as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (ii) assists in the implementation of the national contingency plan or area contingency plan, and which is created in response to the requirements of Title IV, Subtitle B of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Public Law 101-380; (iii) engages primarily in programs to contain, clean up and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring in the United States coastal or tidal waters; and (iv) is used for the purposes of the organization. (gg)  If a municipality changes its boundaries so as to include within the boundaries of such municipality the project site of any project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), all real and personal property located on the project site within the boundaries of such municipality that is owned by a business enterprise operating such project, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation for a period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years upon receiving approval for such exemption by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to authorize a breach of any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 21-1-59. (hh)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests (including, but not limited to, subleaseholds and subleasehold interests), of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of a facility for the manufacture, production, generation, transmission and/or distribution of electricity, and any real property related thereto, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation during the period as the United States is both the title owner of the property and a sublessee of or with respect to the property; however, the exemption authorized by this paragraph (hh) shall not apply to any entity to whom the United States sub-subleases its interest in the property nor to any entity to whom the United States assigns its sublease interest in the property.  As used in this paragraph, the term "United States" includes an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America.  This paragraph (hh) shall apply to all assessments for ad valorem taxation for the 2003 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter. (ii)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, used by Mississippi nonprofit entities qualified, on or before January 1, 2005, under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide support and operate technology incubators for research and development start-up companies, telecommunication startup companies and/or other technology startup companies, utilizing technology spun-off from research and development activities of the public colleges and universities of this state, State of Mississippi governmental research or development activities resulting therefrom located within the State of Mississippi. (jj)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, of start-up companies (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section) for the period of time, not to exceed five (5) years, that the startup company remains a tenant of a technology incubator (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section). (kk)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests, of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of an auxiliary facility, and any real property related thereto, constructed or renovated pursuant to Section 37-101-41. (ll)  Equipment brought into the state temporarily for use during a disaster response period as provided in Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9 and subsequently removed from the state on or before the end of the disaster response period as defined in Section 27-113-5. (mm)  For any lease or contractual arrangement to which the Department of Finance and Administration and a nonprofit corporation are a party to as provided in Section 39-25-1(5), the nonprofit corporation shall, along with the possessory and leasehold interests and/or real and personal property of the corporation, be exempt from all ad valorem taxation, including, but not limited to, school, city and county ad valorem taxes, for the term or period of time stated in the lease or contractual arrangement. (nn) All property, real or personal, that is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and used to provide, free of charge, (i) a practice facility for a public school district swim team, and (ii) a facility for another not-for-profit organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to conduct water safety and lifeguard training programs.  This section shall not apply to real or personal property owned by a country club, tennis club with a pool, or any club requiring stock ownership for membership. (oo)  Any all-terrain vehicle, as defined in Section 63-21-5, when held by a retailer on a consignment or floor plan basis. SECTION 3.  Section 57-75-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 57-75-5.  Words and phrases used in this chapter shall have meanings as follows, unless the context clearly indicates a different meaning: (a)  "Act" means the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act as originally enacted or as hereafter amended. (b) "Authority" means the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority created pursuant to the act. (c)  "Bonds" means general obligation bonds, interim notes and other evidences of debt of the State of Mississippi issued pursuant to this chapter. (d)  "Facility related to the project" means and includes any of the following, as the same may pertain to the project within the project area:  (i) facilities to provide potable and industrial water supply systems, sewage and waste disposal systems and water, natural gas and electric transmission systems to the site of the project; (ii) airports, airfields and air terminals; (iii) rail lines; (iv) port facilities; (v) highways, streets and other roadways; (vi) public school buildings, classrooms and instructional facilities, training facilities and equipment, including any functionally related facilities; (vii) parks, outdoor recreation facilities and athletic facilities; (viii) auditoriums, pavilions, campgrounds, art centers, cultural centers, folklore centers and other public facilities; (ix) health care facilities, public or private; and (x) fire protection facilities, equipment and elevated water tanks. (e)  "Person" means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, limited liability company, receiver, trustee, guardian, executor, administrator, fiduciary, governmental unit, public agency, political subdivision, or any other group acting as a unit, and the plural as well as the singular. (f) "Project" means: (i)  Any industrial, commercial, research and development, warehousing, distribution, transportation, processing, mining, United States government or tourism enterprise together with all real property required for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise with an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings, and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise; or with an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise and which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs; or which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs which provides an average salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxation, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.  "Project" shall include any addition to or expansion of an existing enterprise if such addition or expansion has an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources, or has an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) from private or United States government sources together with all buildings and other supporting land and facilities, structures or improvements of whatever kind required or useful for construction, maintenance and operation of the enterprise and which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs; or which creates at least one thousand (1,000) net new full-time jobs which provides an average salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxation, of at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security. "Project" shall also include any ancillary development or business resulting from the enterprise, of which the authority is notified, within three (3) years from the date that the enterprise entered into commercial production, that the project area has been selected as the site for the ancillary development or business. (ii)  1.  Any major capital project designed to improve, expand or otherwise enhance any active duty or reserve United States armed services bases and facilities or any major Mississippi National Guard training installations, their support areas or their military operations, upon designation by the authority that any such base was or is at risk to be recommended for closure or realignment pursuant to the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990, as amended, or other applicable federal law; or any major development project determined by the authority to be necessary to acquire or improve base properties and to provide employment opportunities through construction of projects as defined in Section 57-3-5, which shall be located on or provide direct support service or access to such military installation property in the event of closure or reduction of military operations at the installation. 2.  Any major study or investigation related to such a facility, installation or base, upon a determination by the authority that the study or investigation is critical to the expansion, retention or reuse of the facility, installation or base. 3.  Any project as defined in Section 57-3-5, any business or enterprise determined to be in the furtherance of the public purposes of this act as determined by the authority or any facility related to such project each of which shall be, directly or indirectly, related to any military base or other military-related facility no longer operated by the United States armed services or the Mississippi National Guard. (iii)  Any enterprise to be maintained, improved or constructed in Tishomingo County by or for a National Aeronautics and Space Administration facility in such county. (iv)  1.  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Seven Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($750,000,000.00) which will create at least three thousand (3,000) jobs meeting criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority. 2. "Project" shall also include any ancillary development or business resulting from an enterprise operating a project as defined in item 1 of this paragraph (f)(iv), of which the authority is notified, within three (3) years from the date that the enterprise entered into commercial production, that the state has been selected as the site for the ancillary development or business. (v)  Any manufacturing, processing or industrial project determined by the authority, in its sole discretion, to contribute uniquely and significantly to the economic growth and development of the state, and which meets the following criteria: 1.  The project shall create at least two thousand (2,000) net new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law. 2.  The project and any facility related to the project shall include a total investment from private sources of not less than Sixty Million Dollars ($60,000,000.00), or from any combination of sources of not less than Eighty Million Dollars ($80,000,000.00). (vi)  Any real property owned or controlled by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, the United States government, or any agency thereof, which is legally conveyed to the State of Mississippi or to the State of Mississippi for the benefit of the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority, its successors and assigns pursuant to Section 212 of Public Law 104-99, enacted January 26, 1996 (110 Stat. 26 at 38). (vii)  Any major capital project related to the establishment, improvement, expansion and/or other enhancement of any active duty military installation and having a minimum capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of at least Forty Million Dollars ($40,000,000.00), and which will create at least four hundred (400) military installation related full-time jobs, which jobs may be military jobs, civilian jobs or a combination of military and civilian jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that the minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met not later than July 1, 2008. (viii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) which will create at least eighty (80) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (ix)  Any regional retail shopping mall with an initial capital investment from private sources in excess of One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), with a square footage in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000) square feet, which will create at least seven hundred (700) full-time jobs with an average hourly wage of Eleven Dollars ($11.00) per hour.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (x)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) which will create at least one hundred twenty-five (125) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the greater.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xi)  Any potential major capital project that the authority has determined is feasible to recruit. (xii)  Any project built according to the specifications and federal provisions set forth by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration Center Operations Directorate at Stennis Space Center for the purpose of consolidating common services from National Aeronautics and Space Administration centers in human resources, procurement, financial management and information technology located on land owned or controlled by the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, which will create at least four hundred seventy (470) full-time jobs. (xiii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources of not less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) which will create at least two hundred fifty (250) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xiv)  Any major pharmaceutical facility with a capital investment of not less than Fifty Million Dollars ($50,000,000.00) made after July 1, 2002, through four (4) years after the initial date of any loan or grant made by the authority for such project, which will maintain at least seven hundred fifty (750) full-time employees.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xv)  Any pharmaceutical manufacturing, packaging and distribution facility with an initial capital investment from any local or federal sources of not less than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) which will create at least ninety (90) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xvi)  Any major industrial wood processing facility with an initial capital investment of not less than One Hundred Million Dollars ($100,000,000.00) which will create at least one hundred twenty-five (125) full-time jobs which provide an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xvii)  Any technical, engineering, manufacturing-logistic service provider with an initial capital investment of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) which will create at least ninety (90) full-time jobs.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xviii)  Any major capital project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of not less than Six Hundred Million Dollars ($600,000,000.00) which will create at least four hundred fifty (450) full-time jobs with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xix)  Any major coal and/or petroleum coke gasification project with an initial capital investment from any source or combination of sources other than the State of Mississippi of not less than Eight Hundred Million Dollars ($800,000,000.00), which will create at least two hundred (200) full-time jobs with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xx)  Any planned mixed use development located on not less than four thousand (4,000) acres of land that will consist of commercial, recreational, resort, tourism and residential development with a capital investment from private sources of not less than Four Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars ($475,000,000.00) in the aggregate in any one (1) or any combination of tourism projects that will create at least three thousand five hundred (3,500) jobs in the aggregate.  For the purposes of this paragraph (f)(xx), the term "tourism project" means and has the same definition as that term has in Section 57-28-1.  In order to meet the minimum capital investment required under this paragraph (f)(xx), at least Two Hundred Thirty-seven Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($237,500,000.00) of such investment must be made not later than June 1, 2015, and the remainder of the minimum capital investment must be made not later than June 1, 2017.  In order to meet the minimum number of jobs required to be created under this paragraph (f)(xx), at least one thousand seven hundred fifty (1,750) of such jobs must be created not later than June 1, 2015, and the remainder of the jobs must be created not later than June 1, 2017.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxi)  Any enterprise owning or operating an automotive manufacturing and assembly plant and its affiliates for which construction begins after March 2, 2007, and not later than December 1, 2007, with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) which will create at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxii)  Any enterprise owning or operating a major powertrain component manufacturing and assembly plant for which construction begins after May 11, 2007, and not later than December 1, 2007, with an initial capital investment from private sources of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual wages and taxable benefits of such jobs shall be at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser. The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxiii)  Any biological and agricultural defense project operated by an agency of the government of the United States with an initial capital investment of not less than Four Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($450,000,000.00) from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions, which will create at least two hundred fifty (250) new full-time jobs.  All jobs created by the project must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law. (xxiv)  Any enterprise owning or operating an existing tire manufacturing plant which adds to such plant capital assets of not less than Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) after January 1, 2009, and that maintains at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) full-time jobs in this state at one (1) location with an average annual salary, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty-five Thousand Dollars ($45,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxv)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of composite components for the aerospace industry which will have an investment from private sources of not less than One Hundred Seventy-five Million Dollars ($175,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will result in the full-time employment at the project site of not less than two hundred seventy-five (275) persons by December 31, 2011, and not less than four hundred twenty-five (425) persons by December 31, 2013, and not less than eight hundred (800) persons by December 31, 2017, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Fifty-three Thousand Dollars ($53,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxvi)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of pipe which will have an investment from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs within five (5) years after the start of commercial production and maintain such jobs for at least ten (10) years, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty-two Thousand Dollars ($32,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxvii)  Any enterprise owning or operating a facility for the manufacture of solar panels which will have an investment from any source other than the State of Mississippi and its subdivisions of not less than One Hundred Thirty-two Million Dollars ($132,000,000.00) by not later than December 31, 2015, and which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs within five (5) years after the start of commercial production and maintain such jobs for at least ten (10) years, all with an average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Thirty-four Thousand Dollars ($34,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. (xxviii)  1.  Any enterprise owning or operating an automotive parts manufacturing plant and its affiliates for which construction begins after June 1, 2013, and not later than June 30, 2014, with an initial capital investment of not less than Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) which will create at least five hundred (500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual wages and taxable benefits of such jobs shall be at least one hundred ten percent (110%) of the most recently published average annual wage of the state or the most recently published average annual wage of the county in which the project is located as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security, whichever is the lesser.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: a.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and b.  That if such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project as determined by the authority shall be repaid. 2.  It is anticipated that the project defined in this subparagraph (xxviii) will expand in three (3) additional phases, will create an additional five hundred (500) full-time jobs meeting the above criteria in each phase, and will invest an additional Three Hundred Million Dollars ($300,000,000.00) per phase. (xxix)  Any enterprise engaged in the manufacture of tires or other related rubber or automotive products for which construction of a plant begins after January 1, 2016, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2022, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate capital investment by such enterprise and its affiliates of not less than One Billion Four Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($1,450,000,000.00) and the creation thereby of at least two thousand five hundred (2,500) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax, of such jobs shall be at least Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for the project shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. (xxx)  Any enterprise owning or operating a maritime fabrication and assembly facility for which construction begins after February 1, 2016, and concludes not later than December 31, 2018, with an initial capital investment in land, buildings and equipment not less than Sixty-eight Million Dollars ($68,000,000.00) and will create not less than one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual compensation, excluding benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income taxes, of at least Forty Thousand Dollars ($40,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  The minimum requirements for the project provided for in this subparagraph shall be met; and 2.  If such commitments are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for the project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. (xxxi)  Each of the projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and 2 that are undertaken by affiliated enterprises, together with any or all of the projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)3 and/or 4 if they are undertaken by the same or other enterprises affiliated with those enterprises that undertake projects defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and 2: 1.  An enterprise engaged in the manufacturing and production of recycled flat-rolled aluminum or related products for which construction of a recycled aluminum flat-rolled mill begins after January 1, 2023, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2026; and 2.  An enterprise engaged in the manufacturing and production of biocarbon from biomass for which construction of the biocarbon manufacturing facility begins after December 1, 2022, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2026; provided that such series of projects may additionally, but shall not be required to, include: 3.  Any other affiliated enterprise that undertakes the development and operation of a new industrial or commercial facility in the state, excluding any area or areas designated by the authority in a written agreement between such enterprise or any affiliate thereof, for which the construction of any such facility begins after January 1, 2023, and is substantially completed no later than December 31, 2029; and/or 4.  An enterprise engaged in the development and operation of port activities (e.g., the loading and unloading of barges, rail cars and trucks, the storage and handling of materials, and other port-related operations) in support of all or any of the enterprises enumerated in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2 and 3, or otherwise in support of an existing electric arc furnace steel mill producing flat-rolled steel and related products; and for which the parent enterprise of such affiliated enterprises enumerated in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 and/or 4 commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by one or more or any combination of such enterprises and their affiliates, as well as by any co-located customers, of not less than Two Billion Five Hundred Million Dollars ($2,500,000,000.00) and the creation thereby of at least one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax, of such jobs shall be at least Ninety-three Thousand Dollars ($93,000.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: a. Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and b.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such affiliated projects may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprises and/or their affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxi), A. a co-located customer shall mean a person who locates and operates any new manufacturing, processing, warehousing and/or distribution facility within the project area for the project defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 and utilizes, directly or indirectly, in its operations any aluminum or related products produced by such project, and B. an affiliated enterprise or an affiliate means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4.  References in the act to a project, as defined by this paragraph (f)(xxxi) shall mean any one of, any combination or all of the projects as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4. (xxxii)  Any enterprise engaged in the manufacture and assembly of battery cells for electric commercial vehicles and industrial applications, for which construction of a manufacturing and assembly plant begins after January 1, 2024, and the manufacturing and assembly of battery cells thereby commences on or prior to December 31, 2029, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, of not less than One Billion Nine Hundred Million Dollars ($1,900,000,000.00) and the creation by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, as well as by any other co-located project participant, of at least two thousand (2,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax prior to January 1, 2024, of such jobs shall be at least Sixty-five Thousand Five Hundred Sixty-four Dollars ($65,564.00).  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxii), a co-located project participant shall mean a person or business entity that, pursuant to one or more contracts with an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxii) or an affiliate thereof, performs within the project area one or more of the following:  a. storage, handling and processing services for raw materials, work in process and/or finished goods inventories; b. maintenance, operation and/or other servicing of equipment and machinery used in the project; c. management of real and tangible personal property used in the project; d. any manufacturing, processing or assembly work, in each instance with respect to the manufacturing and/or assembly of battery cells for electric commercial vehicles or industrial applications manufactured or otherwise assembled within the project area by such enterprise or an affiliate thereof; or e. the supply to such enterprise or any affiliate thereof of any components, parts or materials of any battery cells for electric commercial vehicles or industrial applications manufactured or otherwise assembled within the project area by such enterprise or any affiliate thereof. (xxxiii)  Any enterprise engaged in data processing, for which construction of a data processing facility or facilities begins after January 1, 2024, the processing of data by at least one (1) data processing facility commences on or prior to December 31, 2027, and for which such enterprise commits to an aggregate, collective capital investment by such enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, of not less than Ten Billion Dollars ($10,000,000,000.00) and the creation by such enterprise, one or more affiliates or contractors of such enterprise or any combination of such enterprises and its affiliates, as well as by any other co-located project participant, of at least one thousand (1,000) new full-time jobs meeting criteria established by the authority, which criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the requirement that such jobs must be held by persons eligible for employment in the United States under applicable state and federal law, and the requirement that the average annual salary or wage, excluding the value of any benefits which are not subject to Mississippi income tax prior to January 1, 2024, of such jobs shall be at least one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the published average annual wage of the state as determined by the Mississippi Department of Employment Security.  The authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that: 1.  Minimum requirements for investment and jobs for such affiliated projects shall be met; and 2.  If such requirements are not collectively met, all or a portion of the funds provided by the state for such project may, as determined by the authority, be subject to repayment by such enterprise and/or its affiliates, together with any penalties or damages required by the authority in connection therewith. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxiii), a co-located project participant shall mean a person or business entity that, pursuant to one or more contracts with an enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in this paragraph (f)(xxxiii) or an affiliate thereof, performs within the project area one or more of the following:  a. maintenance, operation and/or other servicing of equipment and machinery used in the project; b. management of real and tangible personal property used in the project; or c. the supply to such enterprise or any affiliate thereof of any components, parts or services within the project area by such enterprise or any affiliate thereof. For purposes of this paragraph (f)(xxxiii), "project" shall include the construction of additional data processing facilities or the expansion of existing data processing facilities within the state by the enterprise, one or more affiliates of such enterprise, or any combination of such enterprise and its affiliates, if such construction or expansion has a minimum capital investment of Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) and creates at least fifty (50) net new full-time jobs and written notice thereof is provided to the authority. (g)  (i)  "Project area" means the project site, together with any area or territory within the state lying within sixty-five (65) miles of any portion of the project site whether or not such area or territory be contiguous; however, for the project defined in paragraph (f)(iv) and (xxxiii) of this section the term "project area" means any area or territory within the state.  The project area shall also include all territory within a county if any portion of such county lies within sixty-five (65) miles of any portion of the project site.  "Project site" means the real property on which the principal facilities of the enterprise will operate; however, for the project defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section, the term "project site" means any area or territory within the state upon which an enterprise constructs one or more data processing facilities.  The provisions of this subparagraph (i) shall not apply to a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section. (ii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section, the term "project area" means the acreage authorized in the certificate of convenience and necessity issued by the Mississippi Development Authority to a regional economic development alliance under Section 57-64-1 et seq. (iii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in either paragraph (f)(xxxi)1 or paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section, the term "project area" means the acreage specified by the authority in written agreement with the enterprise undertaking such project and/or an affiliate thereof. (h)  "Public agency" means: (i)  Any department, board, commission, institution or other agency or instrumentality of the state; (ii)  Any city, town, county, political subdivision, school district or other district created or existing under the laws of the state or any public agency of any such city, town, county, political subdivision or district or any other public entity created or existing under local and private legislation; (iii)  Any department, commission, agency or instrumentality of the United States of America; and (iv)  Any other state of the United States of America which may be cooperating with respect to location of the project within the state, or any agency thereof. (i)  "State" means State of Mississippi. (j)  "Fee-in-lieu" means a negotiated fee to be paid by the project in lieu of any franchise taxes imposed on the project by Chapter 13, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972.  The fee-in-lieu shall not be less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) annually.  A fee-in-lieu may be negotiated with an enterprise operating an existing project defined in paragraph (f)(iv)1 of this section; however, a fee-in-lieu shall not be negotiated for other existing enterprises that fall within the definition of the term "project." (k)  (i) "Affiliate" means a subsidiary or related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi), paragraph (f)(xxviii) or paragraph (f)(xxix) of this section.  The subsidiary or related business must provide services directly related to the core activities of the project. (ii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxi) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxi)1, 2, 3 or 4 of this section. (iii)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxii) of this section. (iv)  For the purposes of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section, an "affiliated enterprise" or an "affiliate" means a related business entity which shares a common direct or indirect ownership with the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section; provided, any such related business entity may be excluded from this definition pursuant to the terms of a written agreement between the authority and the enterprise owning or operating a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxxiii) of this section. (l)  "Tier One supplier" means a supplier of a project as defined in paragraph (f)(xxi) of this section that is certified by the enterprise owning the project and creates a minimum of fifty (50) new full-time jobs. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed June 30, 2026.